District of Columbia statutes.
9-1005

Capital improvements, construction, and rehabilitation.

(a)

It is the sense of the Congress that the Airports Authority should:

(1)

Pursue the improvement, construction, and rehabilitation of the facilities at Washington Dulles International Airport and Washington National Airport simultaneously; and

(2)

To the extent practicable, cause the improvement, construction, and rehabilitation proposed by the Secretary to be completed at both of such Airports within 5 years after the earliest date on which the Airports Authority issues bonds under the authority required by § 9-1006 for any such improvement, construction, or rehabilitation.

(b)

The Secretary shall assist the 3 airports serving the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area in planning for operational and capital improvements at those airports and shall accelerate consideration of applications for federal financial assistance by whichever of the 3 airports is most in need of increasing airside capacity.

History

Oct. 30, 1986, 100 Stat. 3341-376, Pub. L. 99-591, § 6006

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1505.

Short Title

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-1001.